Utah statutes.
16-6a-904.   Advance of expenses for directors.
(1)  A nonprofit corporation may pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses
incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final
disposition of the proceeding if:
(a)  the director furnishes the nonprofit corporation a written affirmation of
the director's good faith belief that the director has met the applicable
standard of conduct described in Section 16-6a-902;
(b)  the director furnishes the nonprofit corporation a written undertaking,
executed personally or on the director's behalf, to repay the advance, if it
is ultimately determined that the director did not meet the standard of
conduct; and
(c)  a determination is made that the facts then known to those making the
determination would not preclude indemnification under this part.
(2)  The undertaking required by Subsection (1)(b):
(a)  shall be an unlimited general obligation of the director;
(b)  need not be secured; and
(c)  may be accepted without reference to financial ability to make repayment.
(3)  Determinations and authorizations of payments under this section shall be
made in the manner specified in Section 16-6a-906.
